Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 23. Municipal Courts

§ 21-23-1.
Municipal courts established.

There shall be a municipal court in all municipalities of this state. Wherever the words “police court” or “police justice” appear in the laws of this state, they shall mean municipal court or municipal judge, respectively.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3001; 1906, §§ 3398, 3399; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5926-5929; 1930, §§ 2535-2537; 1942, § 3374-103; Laws, 1910, ch. 169; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 103; Laws, 1958, ch 517, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 424; Laws, 1979, ch. 401, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 21-23-3.
Appointment of municipal judge and prosecuting attorney in certain municipalities.

In all municipalities having a population of ten thousand (10,000) or more, according to the latest available federal census, there shall be a municipal judge and a prosecuting attorney, who shall be appointed by the governing authorities of the municipality at the time provided for the appointment of other officers. The municipal governing authorities may appoint one (1) additional municipal judge, who shall exercise the same authority and prerogatives of the office, regardless of the presence or absence of the other municipal judge. Except as otherwise provided in Section 21-23-5, a municipal judge shall be a qualified elector of the county in which the municipality is located and shall be an attorney at law. Such municipal judges and prosecuting attorney shall receive a salary, to be paid by the municipality, and to be fixed by the governing authorities of the municipality.

In any proceeding in which a conflict of interest arises for the prosecuting attorney, or any other reason dictates that he recuse himself, the mayor of the municipality may appoint a special prosecuting attorney for that particular proceeding. Such special prosecuting attorney shall be compensated for his services in the same manner and amount as allowed under Section 21-23-7 for appointed counsel for indigent persons.

Provided, however, the governing authorities of any municipality having a population in excess of ten thousand (10,000) persons according to the latest available federal census and situated in a county having an area in excess of nine hundred thirty-five (935) square miles and having a county court may, in their discretion, follow the provisions as set out in Section 21-23-5 for municipalities having a population of less than ten thousand (10,000).

Provided, further, the governing authorities of any municipality having a population in excess of fifty thousand (50,000) according to the latest federal decennial census may, in their discretion, provide for the appointment of not more than ten (10) municipal judges for said municipality, each of whom shall exercise the same authority and prerogatives of their office, regardless of the presence or absence of the other municipal judges.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3001; 1906, §§ 3398, 3399; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5926-5929; 1930, §§ 2535-2537; 1942, § 3374-103; Laws, 1910, ch. 169; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 103; Laws, 1958, ch. 517, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 424; Laws, 1974, ch. 353; Laws, 1979, ch. 401, § 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 571, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 530, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 415, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 406, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 353, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 21-23-5.
Appointment of municipal judge in certain municipalities; qualifications.

In any municipality having a population of less than ten thousand (10,000) according to the latest available federal census, it shall be discretionary with the governing authorities of the municipality as to whether or not a municipal judge or a prosecuting attorney, or both, shall be appointed. If the authorities of any municipality having a population of less than twenty thousand (20,000) according to the latest available federal census appoint a municipal judge, he shall be an attorney licensed in the State of Mississippi or a justice court judge of the county in which the municipality is located. The mayor or mayor pro tempore shall not serve as a municipal judge.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3001; 1906, §§ 3398, 3399; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5926-5929; 1930, §§ 2535-2537; 1942, § 3374-103; Laws, 1910, ch. 169; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 103; Laws, 1958, ch. 517, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 424; Laws, 1976, ch. 379; Laws, 1977, ch. 314; Laws, 1979, ch. 401, § 3; Laws, 1981, chs. 471, § 44, 496, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 423, § 25; Laws, 1989, ch. 571, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 406, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 386, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 21-23-7.
Powers and duties of municipal judge; mayor serving as municipal judge.

The municipal judge shall hold court in a public building designated by the governing authorities of the municipality and may hold court every day except Sundays and legal holidays if the business of the municipality so requires; provided, however, the municipal judge may hold court outside the boundaries of the municipality but not more than within a sixty-mile radius of the municipality to handle preliminary matters and criminal matters such as initial appearances and felony preliminary hearings. The municipal judge may hold court outside the boundaries of the municipality but not more than within a one-mile radius of the municipality for any purpose. The municipal judge shall have the jurisdiction to hear and determine, without a jury and without a record of the testimony, all cases charging violations of the municipal ordinances and state misdemeanor laws made offenses against the municipality and to punish offenders therefor as may be prescribed by law. Except as otherwise provided by law, criminal proceedings shall be brought by sworn complaint filed in the municipal court. Such complaint shall state the essential elements of the offense charged and the statute or ordinance relied upon. Such complaint shall not be required to conclude with a general averment that the offense is against the peace and dignity of the state or in violation of the ordinances of the municipality. He may sit as a committing court in all felonies committed within the municipality, and he shall have the power to bind over the accused to the grand jury or to appear before the proper court having jurisdiction to try the same, and to set the amount of bail or refuse bail and commit the accused to jail in cases not bailable. The municipal judge is a conservator of the peace within his municipality. He may conduct preliminary hearings in all violations of the criminal laws of this state occurring within the municipality, and any person arrested for a violation of law within the municipality may be brought before him for initial appearance. The municipal court shall have jurisdiction of any case remanded to it by a circuit court grand jury. The municipal court shall have civil jurisdiction over actions filed pursuant to and as provided in Title 93, Chapter 21, Mississippi Code of 1972, the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act.

In the discretion of the court, where the objects of justice would be more likely met, as an alternative to imposition or payment of fine and/or incarceration, the municipal judge shall have the power to sentence convicted offenders to work on a public service project where the court has established such a program of public service by written guidelines filed with the clerk for public record. Such programs shall provide for reasonable supervision of the offender and the work shall be commensurate with the fine and/or incarceration that would have ordinarily been imposed. Such program of public service may be utilized in the implementation of the provisions of Section 99-19-20, and public service work thereunder may be supervised by persons other than the sheriff.

The municipal judge may solemnize marriages, take oaths, affidavits and acknowledgments, and issue orders, subpoenas, summonses, citations, warrants for search and arrest upon a finding of probable cause, and other such process under seal of the court to any county or municipality, in a criminal case, to be executed by the lawful authority of the county or the municipality of the respondent, and enforce obedience thereto. The absence of a seal shall not invalidate the process.

When a person shall be charged with an offense in municipal court punishable by confinement, the municipal judge, being satisfied that such person is an indigent person and is unable to employ counsel, may, in the discretion of the court, appoint counsel from the membership of The Mississippi Bar residing in his county who shall represent him. Compensation for appointed counsel in criminal cases shall be approved and allowed by the municipal judge and shall be paid by the municipality. The maximum compensation shall not exceed Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) for any one (1) case. The governing authorities of a municipality may, in their discretion, appoint a public defender(s) who must be a licensed attorney and who shall receive a salary to be fixed by the governing authorities.

The municipal judge of any municipality is hereby authorized to suspend the sentence and to suspend the execution of the sentence, or any part thereof, on such terms as may be imposed by the municipal judge. However, the suspension of imposition or execution of a sentence hereunder may not be revoked after a period of two (2) years. The municipal judge shall have the power to establish and operate a probation program, dispute resolution program and other practices or procedures appropriate to the judiciary and designed to aid in the administration of justice. Any such program shall be established by the court with written policies and procedures filed with the clerk of the court for public record. Subsequent to original sentencing, the municipal judge, in misdemeanor cases, is hereby authorized to suspend sentence and to suspend the execution of a sentence, or any part thereof, on such terms as may be imposed by the municipal judge, if (a) the judge or his or her predecessor was authorized to order such suspension when the sentence was originally imposed; and (b) such conviction (i) has not been appealed; or (ii) has been appealed and the appeal has been voluntarily dismissed.

Upon prior notice to the municipal prosecuting attorney and upon a showing in open court of rehabilitation, good conduct for a period of two (2) years since the last conviction in any court and that the best interest of society would be served, the court may, in its discretion, order the record of conviction of a person of any or all misdemeanors in that court expunged, and upon so doing the said person thereafter legally stands as though he had never been convicted of the said misdemeanor(s) and may lawfully so respond to any query of prior convictions. This order of expunction does not apply to the confidential records of law enforcement agencies and has no effect on the driving record of a person maintained under Title 63, Mississippi Code of 1972, or any other provision of said Title 63.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (6) of this section, a person who was convicted in municipal court of a misdemeanor before reaching his twenty-third birthday, excluding conviction for a traffic violation, and who is a first offender, may utilize the provisions of Section 99-19-71, to expunge such misdemeanor conviction.

In the discretion of the court, a plea of nolo contendere may be entered to any charge in municipal court. Upon the entry of a plea of nolo contendere the court shall convict the defendant of the offense charged and shall proceed to sentence the defendant according to law. The judgment of the court shall reflect that the conviction was on a plea of nolo contendere. An appeal may be made from a conviction on a plea of nolo contendere as in other cases.

Upon execution of a sworn complaint charging a misdemeanor, the municipal court may, in its discretion and in lieu of an arrest warrant, issue a citation requiring the appearance of the defendant to answer the charge made against him. On default of appearance, an arrest warrant may be issued for the defendant. The clerk of the court or deputy clerk may issue such citations.

The municipal court shall have the power to make rules for the administration of the court’s business, which rules, if any, shall be in writing filed with the clerk of the court and shall include the enactment of rules related to the court’s authority to issue domestic abuse protection orders pursuant to Section 93-21-1 et seq.

The municipal court shall have the power to impose punishment of a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or six (6) months imprisonment, or both, for contempt of court. The municipal court may have the power to impose reasonable costs of court, not in excess of the following:

Click to view

No filing fee or such cost shall be imposed for the bringing of an action in municipal court.

A municipal court judge shall not dismiss a criminal case but may transfer the case to the justice court of the county if the municipal court judge is prohibited from presiding over the case by the Canons of Judicial Conduct and provided that venue and jurisdiction are proper in the justice court. Upon transfer of any such case, the municipal court judge shall give the municipal court clerk a written order to transmit the affidavit or complaint and all other records and evidence in the court’s possession to the justice court by certified mail or to instruct the arresting officer to deliver such documents and records to the justice court. There shall be no court costs charged for the transfer of the case to the justice court.

A municipal court judge shall expunge the record of any case in which an arrest was made, the person arrested was released and the case was dismissed or the charges were dropped, there was no disposition of such case or the person was found not guilty at trial.

Dismissal of any affidavit, complaint or charge in municipal court $ 50.00 Suspension of a minor’s driver’s license in lieu of conviction $ 50.00 Service of scirefacias or return “not found” $ 20.00 Causing search warrant to issue or causing prosecution without reasonable cause or refusing to cooperate after initiating action $ 100.00 Certified copy of the court record $ 5.00 Service of arrest warrant for failure to answer citation or traffic summons $ 25.00 Jail cost per day — actual jail cost paid by the municipality but not to exceed $ 35.00 Service of court documents related to the filing of a petition or issuance of a protection from domestic abuse order under Title 93, Chapter 21, Mississippi Code of 1972 $25.00 Any other item of court cost $50.00

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3001; 1906, §§ 3398, 3399; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5926-5929; 1930, §§ 2535-2537; 1942, §§ 3374-103, 3374-104; Laws, 1910, ch. 169; Laws, 1936, ch. 276; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, §§ 103, 104; Laws, 1958, ch. 517, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 424; Laws, 1976, ch. 312; Laws, 1979, ch. 401, § 4; Laws, 1987, ch. 380, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 564, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 322, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 454, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 417, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 619, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 495, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 374, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 545, § 8; Laws, 2013, ch. 358, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 399, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 466, § 39, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 21-23-8.
Bail; purpose; forfeiture; judgment nisi and bench warrant; revocation of authority of surety to write bail bonds upon final judgment; setting of bail.

The purpose of bail is to guarantee appearance and a bail bond shall not be forfeited for any other reason.

If a defendant in any criminal case, proceeding or matter fails to appear for any proceeding as ordered by the municipal court, then the court shall order the bail forfeited and a judgment nisi and a bench warrant issued at the time of nonappearance. The clerk of the municipal court shall notify the surety of the forfeiture by writ of scire facias, with a copy of the judgment nisi and bench warrant attached thereto, within ten (10) working days of such order of judgment nisi either by personal service or by certified mail. Failure of the clerk to provide the required notice within ten (10) working days shall constitute prima facie evidence that the order should be set aside.

1. The judgment nisi shall be returnable for ninety (90) days from the date of issuance. If during that period the defendant appears before the municipal court, or is arrested and surrendered, then the judgment nisi shall be set aside. If the surety produces the defendant or provides to the municipal court reasonable mitigating circumstances upon such showing, then the forfeiture shall not be made final. If the forfeiture is made final, a copy of the final judgment shall be served on the surety within ten (10) working days by either personal service or certified mail.

2. Reasonable mitigating circumstances shall be that the defendant is incarcerated in another jurisdiction; that the defendant is hospitalized under a doctor’s care; that the defendant is in a recognized drug rehabilitation program; that the defendant has been placed in a witness protection program, in which case it shall be the duty of any agency placing the defendant into a witness protection program to notify the municipal court and the municipal court to notify the surety; or any other reason justifiable to the municipal court.

If a final judgment is entered against a surety licensed by the Department of Insurance and has not been set aside after ninety (90) days, or later if such time is extended by the municipal court issuing the judgment nisi, then the municipal court shall order the department to revoke the authority of the surety to write bail bonds. The Commissioner of Insurance shall, upon notice of the municipal court, notify the surety within five (5) working days of receipt of the order of revocation. If after ten (10) working days of the notification the revocation order has not been set aside by the municipal court, then the commissioner shall revoke the authority of the surety and all agents of the surety and shall notify the sheriff of every county of such revocation.

If within eighteen (18) months of the date of the final forfeiture the defendant appears for municipal court, is arrested or surrendered to the municipal court, or if the defendant is found to be incarcerated in another jurisdiction and a hold order placed on the defendant, then the amount of bail, less reasonable extradition cost, excluding attorney fees, shall be refunded by the municipal court upon application by the surety.

The municipal judge shall set the amount of bail for persons charged with offenses in municipal court and may approve the bond or recognizance therefor.

In instances where the municipal judge is unavailable and has not provided a bail schedule or otherwise provided for the setting of bail, it is lawful for any officer or officers designated by order of the municipal judge to take bond, cash, property or recognizance, with or without sureties, in a sum to be determined by the officer, payable to the municipality and conditioned for the appearance of the person on the return day and time of the writ before the court to which the warrant is returnable, or in cases of arrest without a warrant, on the day and time set by the court or officer for arraignment, and there remain from day to day and term to term until discharged.

All bonds shall be promptly returned to the court, together with any cash deposited, and be filed and proceeded on by the court in a case of forfeiture. The chief of the municipal police or a police officer or officers designated by order of the municipal judge may approve bonds or recognizances.

All bonds and recognizances in municipal court where the municipal court shall have the jurisdiction to hear and determine the case may be made payable to the municipality and shall have the effect to bind the principal and any sureties on the bond or recognizance until they shall be discharged by due course of law without renewal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 401, § 5; Laws, 1988, ch. 564, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 547, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 466, § 4; Laws, 2011, ch. 463, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 21-23-9.
Municipal judge pro tempore.

In any municipality where a municipal judge is appointed or elected, the governing authorities shall have the power and authority to appoint a municipal judge pro tempore who shall have the same powers and qualifications for office as the municipal judge and shall perform all duties of the municipal judge in the absence of such municipal judge or if such municipal judge is unable to serve for any reason. In the event a municipal judge pro tempore is not appointed or is absent or unable for any reason to serve, any justice court judge of the county or municipal judge of another municipality may serve in his place with the same power and authority upon designation by the municipal judge. Any municipality that appoints a municipal judge pro tempore in the absence of a municipal judge or has a justice court judge serve in the absence of a municipal court judge, as provided in this section, is authorized to compensate that municipal judge pro tempore or justice court judge in the same manner and amount as the municipality provides for the appointed or elected municipal judge who is absent.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3001; 1906, §§ 3398, 3399; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5926-5929; 1930, §§ 2535-2537; 1942, § 3374-103; Laws, 1910, ch. 169; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 103; Laws, 1958, ch. 517, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 424; Laws, 1979, ch. 401, § 6; Laws, 1997, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1997).

§ 21-23-11.
Clerk of the court.

The clerk of the municipality shall be the clerk of the municipal court, unless the governing authorities shall otherwise elect. The clerk of the court shall attend the sittings of the court in person or by duly appointed deputies, and he shall be under the direction of the municipal judge. The governing authorities may authorize the municipal judge to appoint other municipal employees as deputy clerks of the court to assist the clerk of the court in the conduct of the court’s responsibilities or the governing authorities may appoint deputy clerks of the court. The authorization to appoint and/or appointment of deputy clerks of the court shall be entered in the minutes of the municipality. A police officer of the municipality may be the clerk of the court or a deputy clerk of the court. The governing authorities shall provide for the training of court personnel.

The clerk of the court shall keep permanent dockets, upon which all cases shall be entered; said docket shall contain the style of the case and the nature of the charge against an accused, and the names of witnesses for the prosecution and defendant. The clerk of the court shall also keep a minute record in which all orders and judgments shall be entered. One (1) record may serve as both the docket record and minute record. The clerk of the court or deputy clerk of the court shall issue all process from the court, except arrest warrants or process for the seizure of persons and property, and shall administer the collection of all fines, penalties, fees and costs imposed by the court and deposit all collections with the municipal treasurer or equivalent officer. The clerk of the court shall purchase all dockets, minute record, stationery and other supplies for the municipal court, and have the account allowed by the municipal judge; the order allowing the same shall be entered upon the minutes, and the municipal authorities shall pay the same. The clerk of the court and deputy clerks of the court shall have power to take acknowledgments, administer any oaths required by law to be taken by any person, and take affidavits charging any crime against the municipality or state.

When the municipal judge is unavailable, persons charged with the commission of misdemeanor violations within the municipality may be brought before the clerk of the court for initial appearances required by the Mississippi Uniform Criminal Rules of Circuit Court Practice where the clerk of the court has satisfactorily completed a course of training and education on this subject conducted by the Mississippi Judicial College of the University of Mississippi Law Center and the municipal judge has established written guidelines and procedures for the clerk of the court to discharge this function. Such guidelines shall be entered in the minutes of the court and be deemed a public record and made available to defendant or counsel.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5930; 1930, § 2538; 1942, § 3374-105; Laws, 1910, ch. 202; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 105; Laws, 1979, ch. 401, § 7; Laws, 1988, ch. 418; Laws, 1989, ch. 571, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 506, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 447, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 21-23-12.
Training and education program for municipal court clerks; instruction by Mississippi Judicial College; certificate of completion; compliance with Section 9-1-46.

Every person appointed as clerk of the municipal court shall be required annually to attend and complete a comprehensive course of training and education conducted or approved by the Mississippi Judicial College of the University of Mississippi Law Center. Attendance shall be required beginning with the first training seminar conducted after said clerk is appointed.

The Mississippi Judicial College of the University of Mississippi Law Center shall prepare and conduct a course of training and education for municipal court clerks of the state. The course shall consist of at least twelve (12) hours of training per year. After completion of the first year’s requirement, a maximum of six (6) hours training, over and above the required twelve (12) hours, may be carried forward from the previous year. The content of the course of training and when and where it is to be conducted shall be determined by the judicial college. A certificate of completion shall be furnished to those municipal court clerks who complete such course, and each certificate shall be made a permanent record of the minutes of the board of aldermen or city council in the municipality from which the municipal clerk is appointed.

Upon the failure of any person appointed as clerk of the municipal court to file the certificate of completion as provided in subsection (2) of this section, within the first year of appointment, such person shall then not be allowed to carry out any of the duties of the office of clerk of the municipal court and shall not be entitled to compensation for the period of time during which such certificate remains unfiled.

After August 1, 2015, and each year thereafter, the Administrative Office of Courts shall notify the judicial college of the name of any municipal court clerk who has not complied with the requirements of Section 9-1-46. The Mississippi Judicial College shall not provide such clerk with a certificate of completion of course work until such time that the Administrative Office of Courts has reported that the clerk is in compliance with the requirements of Section 9-1-46. Further, the Administrative Office of Courts shall report the names of all noncompliant clerks to the State Auditor and to the mayor of the municipality that employs the clerk.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 423, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 309, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 71, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 21-23-13.
Executive officer of the court.

The marshal or chief of police of the municipality shall be the executive officer of the municipal court. He shall attend the sittings of the court in person or by duly appointed deputies, and he shall be under the direction of the municipal judge. Any police officer of the municipality may be an ex officio deputy marshal. The marshal or chief of police shall execute all process by himself or deputy and do whatever else may be required of him by the court in the line of his duty.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5930; 1930, § 2538; 1942, § 3374-105; Laws, 1910, ch. 202; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 105; Laws, 1979, ch. 401, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 21-23-15.
Court officers shall not receive fees or costs.

Neither the municipal judge, the marshal or chief of police, any police officer, or any other officer, shall receive any fees or costs in any case in the municipal court.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5930; 1930, § 2538; 1942, § 3374-105; Laws, 1910, ch. 202; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 105; Laws, 1979, ch. 401, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 21-23-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2002, ch. 320, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

[Codes, 1892, § 3001; Laws, 1906, §§ 3398, 3399; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5926-5929; Laws, 1930, §§ 2535-2537; Laws, 1942, § 3374-103; Laws, 1910, ch. 169; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 103; Laws, 1958, ch. 517, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 424; Laws, 1979, ch. 401, § 10; Laws, 1985, ch. 363, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 447, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1995.]

§ 21-23-19.
Disposition of parking violations.

In enforcing the penalty prescribed for violation of all laws and ordinances in regard to parking of vehicles, it shall not be necessary to name any person in a traffic ticket issued for such violation. A traffic ticket attached to the unlawfully parked vehicle shall be sufficient to require the appearance of the operator unlawfully parking such vehicle in the municipal court at the time stated in such traffic ticket. In cases where the name of the operator of an unlawfully parked vehicle is unknown, the owner of record of the unlawfully parked vehicle shall, as a matter of law, be presumed to be the operator of such vehicle and may be charged with such violation. No arrest shall be made for failure of the operator or owner to appear in response to said traffic ticket, except on affidavit and issuance of an arrest warrant. Except in cases where an arrest warrant is issued, it shall not be necessary to enter such cases on the municipal court docket nor to enter final judgment thereon in the minute book of said court. Except as otherwise provided in Section 27-19-56, Mississippi Code of 1972, in enforcing the penalty prescribed for violation of all laws and ordinances in regard to parking of vehicles, no person’s driver’s license shall be suspended or revoked.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-170; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 170; Laws, 1956, ch. 400; Laws, 1979, ch. 401, § 11; Laws, 1988, ch. 563, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 447, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 21-23-20.
Intermittent sentences for misdemeanor convictions.

Upon conviction of any person of a misdemeanor in a municipal court of this state, the municipal court judge shall be authorized, in his discretion, to sentence such person to:

A period of time in jail to be served either on weekends only;

Other periods of time during the week wherein such offender may not be engaged in gainful employment; or

A specified number of days in jail with a provision for the release of such offender for the purpose of engaging in gainful employment at such times as the offender is actually gainfully employed, whether self-employed or otherwise.

In addition, the court may, in its discretion, sentence any convicted person to split periods of incarceration; and the court shall not be required to order such offender to serve a sentence of imprisonment all in one period but may suspend the sentence from time to time.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 387, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 21-23-21.
Applicability of chapter.

The provisions of Sections 21-23-1 through 21-23-19 shall be applicable to all municipalities of this state whether operating under a code charter, special charter, or the commission form of government, except in cases of conflict between the provisions of said sections and the provisions of the special charter of a municipality, or the law governing the commission form of government, in which cases of conflict the provisions of the special charter or the statutes relative to the commission form of government shall control. The provisions of this chapter are cumulative to other applicable laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-111; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 111; Laws, 1979, ch. 401, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 21-23-23.
Municipal Court Collections Payment Program; purpose; funding of program.

The Department of Revenue shall administer the Municipal Court Collections Payment Program. The purpose of the program shall be to provide support for salaries of municipal court personnel, for the purchase, operation and maintenance of software and equipment, for facility planning and improvement, and for other expenses incurred for the purpose of collecting fines and assessments within the municipal court system. Monies appropriated by the Legislature to the Department of Revenue for the purposes of funding the Municipal Court Collections Payment Program shall be expended by the department to each participating municipality based upon that municipality’s deposits in the Treasury of the monies received under the provisions of Section 99-19-73.

The Department of Revenue shall promulgate rules and procedures relating to the disbursement of monies to participating municipalities. The department shall promulgate rules and procedures to ensure that the municipal court system of a participating municipality practices proper and effective collection procedures for the collection of fines and other assessments. If a municipality uses its own employees to collect delinquent fines and other assessments owed to the municipality, then it may use monies from the fund to defray the costs associated with these collection actions. In addition, the governing authority of a participating municipality shall contract with a private attorney or private collection agent or agency to collect delinquent criminal fines and other assessments as provided in Section 21-17-1(6) in order to qualify.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 512, § 2; Laws, 2017, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017.).